Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4426.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2d. (1) A person An individual shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle unless he or she that individual is qualified to operate that vehicle. A motor carrier shall not require or permit a person an individual to operate a commercial motor vehicle unless that person individual is qualified to operate that vehicle. (2) In the case of intrastate transportation, a person an individual is qualified to operate a commercial motor vehicle if he or she that individual meets all of the requirements of 49 CFR parts 383 and 391, except all both of the following provisions: (a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), the person The individual is at least 18 years old when transporting intrastate property or passengers including, but not limited to, . (b) The person is at least 21 years old when transporting hazardous materials in a quantity that requires the vehicle to be marked or placarded under 49 CFR parts 105 to 180. (b) (c) The person individual is eligible for and displays a valid medical waiver card, or is excepted from the medical waiver card provisions under this act. , or, until December 31, 2014, displays a grandfather rights card issued in accordance with this act.